Hawaii statutes.
[§302A-483] Penalties. Any caregiver
who makes a false statement in the affidavit for caregiver consent required
under section 302A-482, shall be subject to the penalties under part V of
chapter 710. [L 2003, c 99, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next